test/src/morphology/N-analiiz_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - analīz: # Noun 141 'eng /est analüüs/fin' - full paradigm
     analīz+N+Sg+Nom: analīz
     analīz+N+Sg+Gen: analīz
     analīz+N+Sg+Par: analīzõ
     analīz+N+Sg+Dat: analīzõn
     analīz+N+Sg+Ins: analīzõks
     analīz+N+Sg+Ill: analīzõ
     analīz+N+Sg+Ela: analīzõst
     analīz+N+Pl+Nom: analīzõd
     analīz+N+Pl+Gen: analīzõd
     analīz+N+Pl+Par: analīzidi
     analīz+N+Pl+Dat: analīzõdõn
     analīz+N+Pl+Ins: analīzõdõks
     analīz+N+Pl+Ill: analīziž
     analīz+N+Pl+Ela: analīzist
